lexicon.lexc
+NAD+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aamibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aamiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aam EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aawaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aawaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aawaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aaban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aawaa EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Sg+3SgProxPoss: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_irrCw                                      !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Boundary
0:%>%> NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_irrCw                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags
@R.Prefix.G@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=G ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.N@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=N ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=O ;
@R.Prefix.W@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=W ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_irrCw                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=N                                           !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=N
@U.Order.Other@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Prefix=N_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_irrCw, Prefix: N, Order: Other             !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Stems
niishkw:niishkw2 NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Boundary ;
